District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0325.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
act may be cited as the “Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Authority Clarification
Amendment Act of 2025”.
Sec. 2. The Board of Ethics and Government Accountability Establishment and
Comprehensive Ethics Reform Amendment Act of 2011, effective April 12, 2012 (D.C. Law 19-
124; D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01 et seq.), is amended as follows:
(a) Section 101(47)(I) (D.C. Official Code § 1-1161.01(47)(I)) is amended by striking the
phrase “and any additional employees designated by rule by the Board of Ethics and Government
Accountability who make decisions or participate substantially in areas of contracting,
procurement, administration of grants or subsidies, developing policies, land use planning,
inspecting, licensing, regulating, or auditing, or act in areas of responsibility that may create a
conflict of interest or appearance of a conflict of interest;”
Sec. 3. Fiscal impact statement.


The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement of the Budget Director as the fiscal impact
statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975, approved
October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
Sec. 4. Effective date.
This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
as provided in section 602(c)(1) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code § 1-206.02(c)(1)).